Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 5. Reorganization and Termination.

§79-10-81.
Merger.

If all the shareholders of the disappearing and surviving corporations are qualified to be shareholders of the surviving corporation, a professional corporation may merge with another domestic or foreign professional corporation or with a domestic or foreign business corporation.

If the surviving corporation is to render professional services in this state, it must comply with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Foreign professional corporations generally, see §§ 79-10-91 through 79-10-95.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2162-2347.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 885 et seq.

§79-10-83.
Termination of professional activities.

If a professional corporation ceases to render professional services, it must amend its articles of incorporation to delete references to rendering professional services and to conform its corporate name to the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01, Mississippi Code of 1972. After the amendment becomes effective, the corporation may continue in existence as a business corporation under the Mississippi Business Corporation Act and it is no longer subject to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 84-99, 179.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 139, 140 et seq.

§79-10-85.
Judicial dissolution.

The Attorney General may commence a proceeding under Sections 79-4-14.30 through 79-4-14.33, Mississippi Code of 1972, to dissolve a professional corporation if:

The Secretary of State or a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation serves written notice on the corporation under Section 79-4-5.04, Mississippi Code of 1972, that it has violated or is violating a provision of this chapter;

The corporation does not correct each alleged violation, or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State or licensing authority that it did not occur, within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under Section 79-4-5.04, Mississippi Code of 1972; and

The Secretary of State or licensing authority certifies to the Attorney General a description of the violation, that it notified the corporation of the violation, and that the corporation did not correct it, or demonstrate that it did not occur, within sixty (60) days after perfection of service of the notice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2348-2515.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 914-916 et seq.